Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1402
Purpose of act.

It is the purpose of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act to simplify the motor fuel tax licensing, bonding, reporting, and remittance requirements imposed on motor carriers involved in interstate commerce by authorizing the director to participate in cooperative fuel tax agreements with another state or states to permit the administration, collection, and enforcement of each state's motor fuel taxes by the base state.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 23.